District of Columbia statutes.
10-205

Compensation.

The members of the Board shall serve without compensation for such service.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 262, ch. 265, art. I, § 4
1981 Ed., § 8-205.
1973 Ed., § 8-205.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.